Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-1003
Private water company; rates and charges; regulation by commission.

The rates and charges of a private water company shall be regulated by the commission as provided in the Water Service Regulation Act. On or before July 1 each year, each private water company shall file a schedule of its rates and charges with the commission and shall also certify to the commission the number of customers it serves.

Laws 1994, LB 1002, § 3.